North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-03.1 Uniform Controlled Substances Act
19-03.1-09.
Schedule III.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule III.

Schedule III consists of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers (whether optical, position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Those compounds, mixtures, or preparations in dosage unit form containing any stimulant substances listed in schedule II and any other drug of the quantitative composition shown in that schedule for those drugs or which is the same except that it contains a lesser quantity of controlled substances.

Benzphetamine.

Chlorphentermine.

Clortermine.

Phendimetrazine.

Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system:

Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing:

Amobarbital;

Secobarbital;

Pentobarbital;

Any suppository dosage form containing:

Amobarbital;

Secobarbital;

Pentobarbital;

Any substance that contains any quantity of a derivative of barbituric acid, or any salt of a derivative of barbituric acid, except those substances which are specifically listed in other schedules thereof.

Chlorhexadol.

Embutramide.

Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid in a United States food and drug administration-approved drug product.

Ketamine.

Lysergic acid.

Lysergic acid amide.

Methyprylon.

Perampanel.

Sativex or its successor name as determined by the federal food and drug administration.

Sulfondiethylmethane.

Sulfonethylmethane.

Sulfonmethane.

Tiletamine and zolazepam or any salt thereof. Some trade or other names for a tiletamine-zolazepam combination product: Telazol. Some trade or other names for tiletamine: 2-(ethylamino)-2-(2-thienyl)-cyclohexanone. Some trade or other names for zolazepam: 4-2(2-fluorophenyl)-6, 8-dihydro-1,3,8-trimethylpyrazolo-[3,4-e][1,4]-diazepin-7(1H)-one, flupyrazapon.

Nalorphine.

Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth below:

Not more than 1.80 grams of codeine per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with an equal or greater quantity of an isoquinoline alkaloid of opium.

Not more than 1.80 grams of codeine per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.

Not more than 1.80 grams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or not more than 90 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.

Not more than 300 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or not more than 15 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.

Not more than 500 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams, or not more than 25 milligrams per dosage unit, with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.

Not more than 50 milligrams of morphine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams with one or more active, non-narcotic ingredients in recognized therapeutic amounts.

Buprenorphine.

Anabolic steroids. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any of the following anabolic steroids:

3beta,17-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;

3alpha,17beta-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;

5alpha-androstan-3,17-dione;

1-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androst-1-ene);

1-androstenediol (3alpha,17beta-dihydroxy-5alpha-androst-1-ene);

4-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-4-ene);

5-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-androst-5-ene);

1-androstenedione ([5alpha]-androst-1-en-3,17-dione);

4-androstenedione (androst-4-en-3,17-dione);

5-androstenedione (androst-5-en-3,17-dione);

Bolasterone (7alpha,17alpha-dimethyl-17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

Boldenone (17beta-hydroxyandrost-1,4,-diene-3-one);

Boldione (androsta-1,4-diene-3,17-dione);

Calusterone (7beta,17alpha-dimethyl-17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

Clostebol (4-chloro-17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

Dehydrochloromethyltestosterone (4-chloro-17beta-hydroxy-17alpha-methyl-androst-1,4-dien-3-one);

Delta-1-dihydrotestosterone (also known as ‘1-testosterone’) (17beta-hydroxy-5alpha-androst-1-en-3-one);

Desoxymethyltestosterone (17a-methyl-5a-androst-2-en-17ol) (also known as madol);

4-dihydrotestosterone (17beta-hydroxy-androstan-3-one);

Drostanolone (17beta-hydroxy-2alpha-methyl-5alpha-androstan-3-one);

Ethylestrenol (17alpha-ethyl-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-ene);

Fluoxymesterone (9-fluoro-17alpha-methyl-11beta, 17beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

Formebolone (2-formyl-17alpha-methyl-11alpha, 17beta-dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);

Furazabol (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyandrostano[2,3-c]-furazan);

13beta-ethyl-17alpha-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one;

4-hydroxytestosterone (4,17beta-dihydroxy-androst-4-en-3-one);

Norboletheone (13beta,17alpha-diethyl-17beta-hydroxygon-4-en-3-one);

Norclostebol (4-chloro-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

Hallucinogenic substances.

Dronabinol (synthetic) [(-)-delta-9-(trans)-tetrahydrocannabinol] in sesame oil and encapsulated in a soft gelatin capsule in a United States food and drug administration-approved drug product.

Any product in hard or soft gelatin capsule form containing natural dronabinol (derived from the cannabis plant) or synthetic dronabinol (produced from synthetic materials) in sesame oil, for which an abbreviated new drug application has been approved by the food and drug administration under section 505(j) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 U.S.C. 355(j)] which references as its listed drug the drug product referred to in subdivision a.

The board may except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any stimulant or depressant substance listed in subsections 3 and 4 from the application of all or any part of this chapter if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one or more active medicinal ingredients not having a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a stimulant or depressant effect on the central nervous system.

or any salt thereof and one or more other active medicinal ingredients which are not listed in any schedule.

or any salt of any of these drugs and approved by the food and drug administration for marketing only as a suppository.

aa.

4-hydroxy-19-nortestosterone (4,17beta-dihydroxy-estr-4-en-3-one);

bb.

Mestanolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-5-androstan-3-one);

cc.

Mesterolone (1alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-[5alpha]-androstan-3-one);

dd.

Methandienone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-dihydroxyandrost-1,4-dien-3-one);

ee.

Methandriol (17alpha-methyl-3beta,17beta-dihydroxyandrost-5-ene);

ff.

Methasterone (2[alpha],17[alpha]-dimethyl-5[alpha]-androstan-17[beta]-ol-3-one);

gg.

Methenolone (1-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-5alpha-androst-1-en-3-one);

hh.

17alpha-methyl-3beta,17beta-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;

ii.

17alpha-methyl-3alpha,17beta-dihydroxy-5a-androstane;

jj.

17alpha-methyl-3beta,17beta-dihyroxyandrost-4-ene;

kk.

17alpha-methyl-4-hydroxynandrolone (17alpha-methyl-4-hydroxy-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

ll.

Methyldienolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyestra-4,9(10)-dien-3-one);

mm.

Methyltrienolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyestra-4,9(11)-trien-3-one);

nn.

Methyltestosterone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

oo.

Mibolerone (7alpha,17alpha-dimethyl-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

pp.

17alpha-methyl-delta1-dihydrotestosterone (17bbeta-hydroxy-17alpha-methyl-5alpha-androst-1-en-3-one) (also known as ‘17-alpha-methyl-1-testosterone’);

qq.

Nandrolone (17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

rr.

19-nor-4-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);

ss.

19-nor-4-androstenediol (3alpha,17beta-dihydroxyestr-4-ene);

tt.

19-nor-5-androstenediol (3beta,17beta-dihydroxyestr-5-ene);

uu.

19-nor-5-androstenediol (3alpha,17-beta-dihydroxyester-5-ene);

vv.

19-nor-4-androstenedione (estr-4-en-3,17-dione);

ww.

19-nor-4,9(10)-androstadienedione (estra-4,9(10)-diene-3,17-dione);

xx.

19-nor-5-androstenedione (estr-5-en-3,17-dione);

aaa.

Norethandrolone (17alpha-ethyl-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

bbb.

Normethandrolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxyestr-4-en-3-one);

ccc.

Oxandrolone (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy-2-oxa-[5alpha]-androstan-3-one);

ddd.

Oxymesterone (17alpha-methyl-4-17beta-dihydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

eee.

Oxymetholone (17alpha-methyl-2-hydroxymethylene-17beta-hydroxy [5alpha]-androstan-3-one);

fff.

Stanozolol (17alpha-methyl-17beta-hydroxy[5alpha]-androst-2-eno[3,2-c]-pyrazole);

ggg.

Stenbolone (17beta-hydroxy-2-methyl-[5alpha]-androst-1-en-3-one);

hhh.

Prostanozol (17[beta]- hydroxy-5[alpha]-androstano[3,2-c]pyrazole);

iii.

Testolactone (13-hydroxy-3-oxo-13,17-secoandrosta-1,4-dien-17-oic acid lactone);

jjj.

Testosterone (17beta-hydroxyandrost-4-en-3-one);

kkk.

Tetrahydrogestrinone (13beta,17alpha-diethyl-17beta-hydroxygon-4,9,11-trien-3-one);

lll.

Trenbolone (17 beta-hydroxyestr-4,9,11-trien-3-one);

or any salt, ester, or isomer of a drug or substance described or listed in this subsection, if that salt, ester, or isomer promotes muscle growth.

The term does not include an anabolic steroid that is expressly intended for administration through implants to cattle or other nonhuman species and which has been approved by the secretary of health and human services for administration unless any person prescribes, dispenses, possesses, delivers, or distributes for human use.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 9; 1977, ch. 194, § 4; 1979, ch. 288, § 3; 1985, ch. 258, § 17; 1985, ch. 262, § 8; 1985, ch. 265, § 3; 1987, ch. 264, § 3; 1989, ch. 266, § 4; 1991, ch. 223, § 5; 2001, ch. 213, § 5; 2003, ch. 182, § 1; 2007, ch. 208, § 3; 2009, ch. 199, § 2; 2011, ch. 161, § 3; 2013, ch. 184, § 2; 2015, ch. 169, § 2, effective March 19, 2015; 2019, ch. 185, § 4, effective April 9, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 2 of chapter 169, S.L. 2015 became effective March 19, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in
section 4 of chapter 169, S.L. 2015.

19-03.1-10.
Schedule IV tests.

The board shall place a substance in schedule IV if it finds that:

The substance has a low potential for abuse relative to substances in schedule III;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; and

Abuse of the substance may lead to limited physical dependence or psychological dependence relative to the substances in schedule III.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 10; 1985, ch. 262, § 9.

19-03.1-11.
Schedule IV.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule IV.

Schedule IV consists of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth below:

Not more than 1 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit.

Dextropropoxyphene (also known as alpha-(+)-4-dimethylamino- 1,2-diphenyl-3-methyl-2-propionoxybutane).

2-[(dimethylamino)methyl]-1-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexanol, its salts, optical and geometric isomers and salts of these isomers including Tramadol.

Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of the following substances, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of those salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation:

Alprazolam.

Alfaxalone.

Barbital.

Brexanolone.

Bromazepam.

Camazepam.

Carisoprodol.

Chloral betaine.

Chloral hydrate.

Chlordiazepoxide.

Clobazam.

Clonazepam.

Clorazepate.

Clotiazepam.

Cloxazolam.

Delorazepam.

Diazepam.

Dichloralphenazone.

Estazolam.

Ethchlorvynol.

Ethinamate.

Ethyl loflazepate.

Fludiazepam.

Flunitrazepam.

Flurazepam.

Fospropofol.

Fenfluramine. Any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, including its salts, isomers (whether optical, position, or geometric), and salts of such isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible: Fenfluramine.

Stimulants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers:

Cathine.

Diethylpropion.

Fencamfamin.

Fenproporex.

Mazindol.

Mefenorex.

Modafinil.

Pemoline (including organometallic complexes and chelates thereof).

Phentermine.

Pipradrol.

Sibutramine.

Solriamfetol.

SPA ((-)-1-dimethylamino-1, 2-diphenylethane).

Other substances. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of:

Pentazocine, including its salts.

Butorphanol, including its optical isomers.

Eluxadoline (5-[[[(2S)-2-amino-3-[4-aminocarbonyl)-2,6-dimethylphenyl]-1-oxopropyl] [(1S)-1-(4-phenyl-1H-imidazol-2-yl)ethyl]amino]methyl]-2-methoxybenzoic acid) (including its optical isomers) and its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers.

The board may except by rule any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any depressant substance listed in subsection 2 from the application of all or any part of this chapter if the compound, mixture, or preparation contains one or more active medicinal ingredients not having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, and if the admixtures are included therein in combinations, quantity, proportion, or concentration that vitiate the potential for abuse of the substances which have a depressant effect on the central nervous system.

aa.

Halazepam.

bb.

Haloxazolam.

cc.

Indiplon.

dd.

Ketazolam.

ee.

Lemborexant.

ff.

Loprazolam.

gg.

Lorazepam.

hh.

Lorcaserin.

ii.

Lormetazepam.

jj.

Mebutamate.

kk.

Medazepam.

ll.

Meprobamate.

mm.

Methohexital.

nn.

Methylphenobarbital (also known as mephobarbital).

oo.

Midazolam.

pp.

Nimetazepam.

qq.

Nitrazepam.

rr.

Nordiazepam.

ss.

Oxazepam.

tt.

Oxazolam.

uu.

Paraldehyde.

vv.

Petrichloral.

ww.

Phenobarbital.

xx.

Pinazepam.

yy.

Propofol.

zz.

Prazepam.

aaa.

Quazepam.

bbb.

Remimazolam.

ccc.

Suvorexant.

ddd.

Temazepam.

eee.

Tetrazepam.

fff.

Triazolam.

ggg.

Zaleplon.

hhh.

Zolpidem.

iii.

Zopiclone.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 11; 1977, ch. 194, § 5; 1979, ch. 288, § 4; 1985, ch. 262, § 10; 1985, ch. 265, § 4; 1987, ch. 264, § 4; 1989, ch. 266, § 5; 1991, ch. 223, § 6; 1993, ch. 220, § 3; 1997, ch. 123, § 5; 1999, ch. 379, § 2; 2001, ch. 213, § 6; 2003, ch. 182, § 2; 2007, ch. 208, § 4; 2009, ch. 199, § 3; 2011, ch. 161, § 4; 2013, ch. 184, § 3; 2015, ch. 169, § 3, effective March 19, 2015; 2017, ch. 163, § 3, effective March 13, 2017; 2019, ch. 185, § 5, effective April 9, 2019; 2021, ch. 173, § 4, effective April 16, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 3 of chapter 169, S.L. 2015 became effective March 19, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in
section 4 of chapter 169, S.L. 2015.

19-03.1-12.
Schedule V tests.

The board shall place a substance in schedule V if it finds that:

The substance has low potential for abuse relative to the controlled substances listed in schedule IV;

The substance has currently accepted medical use in treatment in the United States; and

The substance has limited physical dependence or psychological dependence liability relative to the controlled substances listed in schedule IV.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 12; 1985, ch. 262, § 11.

19-03.1-13.
Schedule V.

The controlled substances listed in this section are included in schedule V.

Schedule V consists of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, listed in this section.

Narcotic drugs. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs and their salts.

Narcotic drugs containing non-narcotic active medicinal ingredients. Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any of the following narcotic drugs, or their salts calculated as the free anhydrous base or alkaloid, in limited quantities as set forth below, which includes one or more non-narcotic active medicinal ingredients in sufficient proportion to confer upon the compound, mixture, or preparation valuable medicinal qualities other than those possessed by narcotic drugs alone.

Not more than 200 milligrams of codeine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams.

Not more than 100 milligrams of dihydrocodeine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams.

Not more than 100 milligrams of ethylmorphine per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams.

Not more than 2.5 milligrams of diphenoxylate and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit.

Not more than 100 milligrams of opium per 100 milliliters or per 100 grams.

Not more than 0.5 milligram of difenoxin and not less than 25 micrograms of atropine sulfate per dosage unit.

Depressants. Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including its salts, isomers, and salts of isomers whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible:

Brivaracetam ((2 S)-2-[(4 R)-2-oxo-4-propylpyrrolidin-1-yl]butanamide) (also referred to as BRV; UCB-34714; Briviact) (including its salts).

Cenobamate [(1R)-1-(2-chlorophenyl)-2-(tetrazol-2-yl)ethyl] carbamate; 2 H-tetrazole-2- ethanol, alpha-(2-chlorophenyl)-, carbamate (ester), (alphaR)-; carbamic acid (R)-(+)-1- (2-chlorophenyl)-2-(2 H-tetrazol-2-yl)ethyl ester).

Ezogabine N-[2-amino-4-(4-fluorobenzylamino)-phenyl]-carbamic acid ethyl ester.

Lacosamide [(R)-2-acetoamido-N-benzyl-3-methoxy-propionamide].

Lasmiditan [2,4,6-trifluoro-N-(6-(1-methylpiperidine-4-carbonyl)pyridine-2-yl-benzamide].

Pregabalin [(S)-3-(aminomethyl)-5-methylhexanoic acid].

Gabapentin [2-[1-(aminomethyl) cyclohexyl] acetic acid].

Stimulants. Unless specifically exempted or excluded or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of the following substances having a stimulant effect on the central nervous system, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers: Pyrovalerone.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 13; 1979, ch. 288, § 5; 1985, ch. 258, § 18; 1985, ch. 265, § 5; 1987, ch. 264, § 5; 1989, ch. 266, § 6; 1991, ch. 223, § 7; 1993, ch. 220, § 4; 2007, ch. 208, § 5; 2011, ch. 161, § 5; 2013, ch. 184, § 4; 2017, ch. 163, § 4, effective March 13, 2017; 2019, ch. 185, § 6, effective April 9, 2019; 2021, ch. 173, § 5, effective April 16, 2021.

19-03.1-14.
Republishing of schedules.

The board shall revise and republish the schedules annually.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 14; 1985, ch. 262, § 12.

19-03.1-15.
Rules.

The board may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 28-32 and charge reasonable fees relating to the registration and control of the manufacture, distribution, and dispensing of controlled substances within this state.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 15; 1981, ch. 336, § 10; 1985, ch. 262, § 13.

19-03.1-16.
Registration requirements.

Every person who manufactures, distributes, or dispenses any controlled substance within this state or who proposes to engage in the manufacture, distribution, or dispensing of any controlled substance within this state shall obtain annually a registration issued by the board in accordance with its rules.

Persons registered by the board under this chapter to manufacture, distribute, dispense, or conduct research with controlled substances may possess, manufacture, distribute, dispense, or conduct research with those substances to the extent authorized by their registration and in conformity with the other provisions of this chapter.

The following persons need not register and may lawfully possess controlled substances under this chapter:

An agent or employee of any registered manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser of any controlled substance if an agent or employee is acting in the usual course of an agent’s or employee’s business or employment.

A common or contract carrier or warehouseman, or an employee thereof, whose possession of any controlled substance is in the usual course of business or employment.

An ultimate user or a person in possession of any controlled substance pursuant to a lawful order of a practitioner or in lawful possession of a schedule V substance.

The board may waive by rule the requirement for registration of certain manufacturers, distributors, or dispensers if it finds it consistent with the public health and safety.

A separate registration is required at each principal place of business or professional practice where the applicant manufactures, distributes, or dispenses controlled substances.

The board may inspect the establishment of a registrant or applicant for registration in accordance with the rules of the board.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 16; 1985, ch. 258, § 19; 1985, ch. 262, § 14; 1985, ch. 265, § 6.

19-03.1-17.
Registration. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The board shall register an applicant to manufacture or distribute controlled substances included in sections 19-03.1-05, 19-03.1-07, 19-03.1-09, 19-03.1-11, and 19-03.1-13 unless it determines that the issuance of that registration would be inconsistent with the public interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider the following factors:

Maintenance of effective controls against diversion of controlled substances into other than legitimate medical, scientific, or industrial channels;

Compliance with applicable state and local laws;

Any convictions of the applicant under any federal and state laws relating to any controlled substance;

Past experience in the manufacture or distribution of controlled substances and the existence in the applicant’s establishment of effective controls against diversion;

Furnishing by the applicant of false or fraudulent material in any application filed under this chapter;

Suspension or revocation of the applicant’s federal registration to manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled substances as authorized by federal law; and

Any other factors relevant to and consistent with the public health and safety.

Registration under subsection 1 does not entitle a registrant to manufacture and distribute controlled substances in schedule I or II other than those specified in the registration.

Practitioners must be registered to dispense any controlled substances or to conduct research with controlled substances in schedules II through V if they are authorized to dispense or conduct research under the laws of this state. The board need not require separate registration under this chapter for practitioners engaging in research with non-narcotic controlled substances in schedules II through V where the registrant is already registered under this chapter in another capacity. Practitioners registered under federal law to conduct research with schedule I substances may conduct research with schedule I substances within this state upon furnishing the state department of health evidence of that federal registration.

Compliance by manufacturers and distributors with the provisions of the federal law respecting registration (excluding fees) entitles them to be registered under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 17; 1985, ch. 262, § 15; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

19-03.1-17.
Registration. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The board shall register an applicant to manufacture or distribute controlled substances included in sections 19-03.1-05, 19-03.1-07, 19-03.1-09, 19-03.1-11, and 19-03.1-13 unless it determines that the issuance of that registration would be inconsistent with the public interest. In determining the public interest, the board shall consider the following factors:

Maintenance of effective controls against diversion of controlled substances into other than legitimate medical, scientific, or industrial channels;

Compliance with applicable state and local laws;

Any convictions of the applicant under any federal and state laws relating to any controlled substance;

Past experience in the manufacture or distribution of controlled substances and the existence in the applicant’s establishment of effective controls against diversion;

Furnishing by the applicant of false or fraudulent material in any application filed under this chapter;

Suspension or revocation of the applicant’s federal registration to manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled substances as authorized by federal law; and

Any other factors relevant to and consistent with the public health and safety.

Registration under subsection 1 does not entitle a registrant to manufacture and distribute controlled substances in schedule I or II other than those specified in the registration.

Practitioners must be registered to dispense any controlled substances or to conduct research with controlled substances in schedules II through V if they are authorized to dispense or conduct research under the laws of this state. The board need not require separate registration under this chapter for practitioners engaging in research with non-narcotic controlled substances in schedules II through V where the registrant is already registered under this chapter in another capacity. Practitioners registered under federal law to conduct research with schedule I substances may conduct research with schedule I substances within this state upon furnishing the department evidence of that federal registration.

Compliance by manufacturers and distributors with the provisions of the federal law respecting registration (excluding fees) entitles them to be registered under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 17; 1985, ch. 262, § 15; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 85, effective September 1, 2022.

19-03.1-17.1.
Criminal history record checks.

The board may require an applicant for registration or a registrant whose registration is subject to revocation or suspension or employees or officers of an applicant or registrant to submit to a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check. The nationwide criminal history record check must be conducted in the manner provided by section 12-60-24. All costs associated with obtaining a background check are the responsibility of the applicant or registrant.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 115, § 7.

19-03.1-18.
Revocation and suspension of registration.

A registration under section 19-03.1-17 to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance may be suspended or revoked by the board upon a finding that the registrant:

Has furnished false or fraudulent material information in any application filed under this chapter;

Has been convicted of a felony under any state or federal law relating to any controlled substance; or

Has had the registrant’s federal registration suspended or revoked to manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled substances.

The board may limit revocation or suspension of a registration to the particular controlled substance with respect to which grounds for revocation or suspension exist.

If the board suspends or revokes a registration, all controlled substances owned or possessed by the registrant at the time of suspension or the effective date of the revocation order may be placed under seal. No disposition may be made of substances under seal until the time for taking an appeal has elapsed or until all appeals have been concluded unless a court, upon application therefor, orders the sale of perishable substances and the deposit of the proceeds of the sale with the court. Upon a revocation order becoming final, all controlled substances may be forfeited to the state.

The board shall promptly notify the bureau of all orders suspending or revoking registration and all forfeitures of controlled substances.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 18; 1985, ch. 258, § 20; 1985, ch. 262, § 16.

19-03.1-19.
Order to show cause.

Before denying, suspending, or revoking a registration, or refusing a renewal of registration, the board shall serve upon the applicant or registrant an order to show cause why registration should not be denied, revoked, or suspended, or why the renewal should not be refused. The order to show cause must contain a statement of the basis therefor and must call upon the applicant or registrant to appear before the board at a time and place not less than thirty days after the date of service of the order, but in the case of a denial or renewal of registration the show cause order must be served not later than thirty days before the expiration of the registration. These proceedings must be conducted in accordance with chapter 28-32 without regard to any criminal prosecution or other proceeding. Proceedings to refuse renewal of registration do not abate the existing registration which remains in effect pending the outcome of the administrative hearing.

The board may suspend, without an order to show cause, any registration simultaneously with the institution of proceedings under section 19-03.1-18, or where renewal of registration is refused, if it finds that there is an imminent danger to the public health or safety which warrants this action. The suspension continues in effect until the conclusion of the proceedings, including judicial review thereof, unless sooner withdrawn by the board or dissolved by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 19; 1985, ch. 262, § 17.

19-03.1-20.
Records of registrants.

Persons registered to manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled substances under this chapter shall keep records and maintain inventories in conformance with the recordkeeping and inventory requirements of federal law and with any additional rules the board issues.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 20; 1985, ch. 262, § 18.

19-03.1-20.1.
Report of any theft or loss.

The registrant shall immediately, within one business day, notify the state board of pharmacy of any theft or significant loss of controlled substances. This report may be telephoned, faxed, or electronic mailed to the state board of pharmacy. In addition, significant loss has been further defined to include a list of factors that are relevant in deciding whether a loss was significant. This list is as follows:

The actual quantity of controlled substances lost in relation to the type of business;

The specific controlled substances lost;

Whether the loss of the controlled substances can be associated with access to those controlled substances by specific individuals, or whether the loss can be attributed to unique activities that may take place involving the controlled substances;

A pattern of losses over a specific time period, whether the losses appear to be random, and the results of efforts taken to resolve the losses; and, if known

Whether specific controlled substances are likely candidates for diversion; and

Local trends and other indicators of the diversion potential of the missing controlled substance.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 208, § 6.

19-03.1-21.
Order forms.

Controlled substances in schedules I and II must be distributed by a registrant to another registrant only pursuant to an order form. Compliance with the provisions of federal law respecting order forms must be deemed compliance with this section.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 21.

19-03.1-22.
Prescriptions.

Except when dispensed directly by a practitioner, other than a pharmacy, to an ultimate user, no controlled substance in schedule II may be dispensed without the written prescription of a practitioner. When the patient is a hospice patient or resides in a licensed long-term care facility and the prescription has been signed by the practitioner before faxing, the facsimile may serve as the original prescription without another signature. The prescription may not be filled more than six months after the date it was written.

In emergency situations, as defined by rule of the board, schedule II drugs may be dispensed upon oral prescription of a practitioner, reduced promptly to writing, and filed by the pharmacy. Prescriptions must be retained in conformity with the requirements of section 19-03.1-20. No prescription for a schedule II substance may be refilled.

Except when dispensed directly by a practitioner, other than a pharmacy, to an ultimate user, a controlled substance included in schedule III or IV, which is a prescription drug as determined under this chapter or chapter 19-02.1, may not be dispensed without a written or oral prescription of a practitioner. The prescription may not be filled or refilled more than six months after the date thereof or be refilled more than five times, unless renewed by the practitioner. Any oral prescription for such drugs must be promptly reduced to writing by the pharmacist, intern, or technician on a new prescription blank. When the patient is a hospice patient or resides in a licensed long-term care facility and the prescription has been signed by the practitioner before faxing, the facsimile may serve as the original prescription without another signature.

Except when dispensed directly by a practitioner, other than a pharmacy, to an ultimate user, no controlled substance included in schedule V must be dispensed without the written or oral prescription of a practitioner. The prescription may not be filled or refilled more than six months after the date thereof or be refilled more than five times unless renewed by the practitioner. Any oral prescription for such compound, mixture, or preparation must be promptly reduced to writing by the pharmacist, intern, or technician on a new prescription blank. When the patient is a hospice patient or resides in a licensed long-term care facility and the prescription has been signed by the practitioner before faxing, the facsimile may serve as the original prescription without another signature.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 22; 1975, ch. 195, § 1; 1985, ch. 262, § 19; 1999, ch. 379, § 3; 2001, ch. 213, § 7; 2007, ch. 208, § 7.

Collateral References.

Prescriptions: construction of provision of Uniform Narcotic Drug Act requiring a physician’s prescription as a prerequisite to a pharmacist’s sale of narcotics, 10 A.L.R.3d 560.

Construction of provision of Uniform Narcotic Drug Act or similar statute dealing with obtaining or procuring the administration of a narcotic drug by fraud or deceit, 25 A.L.R.3d 1118.

Giving, selling, or prescribing dangerous drugs as contributing to the delinquency of a minor, 36 A.L.R.3d 1292.

Promotional efforts directed towards prescribing physician as affecting prescription drug manufacturer’s liability for product-caused injury, 94 A.L.R.3d 1080.

Defense of necessity, duress, or coercion in prosecution for violation of state narcotics law, 1 A.L.R.5th 938.

State law criminal liability of licensed physician for prescribing or dispensing drug or similar controlled substance, 13 A.L.R.5th 1.

Physician’s liability for injury or death resulting from side effects of drugs intentionally administered to or prescribed for patient, 47 A.L.R.5th 433.

19-03.1-22.1.
Volatile chemicals — Inhalation of vapors prohibited — Definitions — Penalty.

An individual is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if that individual intentionally inhales the vapors of a volatile chemical in a manner designed to affect the individual’s central nervous system; to create or induce a condition of intoxication, hallucination, or elation; or to distort, disturb, or change the individual’s eyesight, thinking processes, balance, or coordination. An individual is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if that individual violates this section for a third or subsequent offense within one year of the first offense. For a third or subsequent offense, the sentence must include an order for an addiction evaluation by, and compliance with recommendations from, an appropriate licensed addiction treatment program.

This section does not apply to inhalations specifically prescribed for medical, dental, or optometric treatment purposes or to controlled substances described in this chapter. For the purposes of this section, “volatile chemical” includes the following chemicals or their isomers:

Acetone.

Aliphatic hydrocarbons.

Amyl nitrite.

Butane.

Butyl nitrite.

Carbon tetrachloride.

Chlorinated hydrocarbons.

Chlorofluorocarbons.

Chloroform.

Cyclohexane.

Diethyl ether.

Ethyl acetate.

Fluorocarbon.

Glycol ether inter solvent.

Glycol ether solvent.

Hexane.

Ketone solvent.

Methanol.

Methyl cellosolve acetate.

Methyl ethyl ketone.

Methyl isobutyl ketone.

Nitrous oxide.

Petroleum distillate.

Toluene.

Trichloroethane.

Trichloroethylene.

aa.

Xylol or xylene.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 214, § 3; 2021, ch. 174, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.